Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.08.092

Increase or decrease of capital stock authorized.

A bank may increase or decrease its capital stock by amendment to its articles of incorporation. No issuance of capital stock shall be valid, until the amount thereof shall have been actually paid in. No reduction of the capital stock shall be made to an amount less than is required for capital by the director.

[ 2014 c 37 s 164. Prior: 1994 c 256 s 48; 1994 c 92 s 55; 1987 c 420 s 4. Formerly RCW 30.08.092.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.